Massachusetts, session 194th, H4210.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The first paragraph of section 5 of chapter 137 of the acts of 1995 is hereby 
amended by striking out the words “and, although he need not be a resident of the town or 
commonwealth when appointed, shall become a resident of the town within one year after 
appointment”.  
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.